Utah statutes.
75-7-104.   Knowledge.
(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), a person has knowledge of a fact if the
person:
(a)  has actual knowledge of it;
(b)  has received a notice or notification of it; or
(c)  from all the facts and circumstances known to the person at the time in
question, has reason to know it.
(2)  An organization that conducts activities through employees has notice or
knowledge of a fact involving a trust only from the time the information was
received by an employee having responsibility to act for the trust, or would
have been brought to the employee's attention if the organization had
exercised reasonable diligence.  An organization exercises reasonable
diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant
information to the employee having responsibility to act for the trust and
there is reasonable compliance with the routines.  Reasonable diligence does
not require an employee of the organization to communicate information unless
the communication is part of the individual's regular duties or the individual
knows a matter involving the trust would be materially affected by the
information.
